Utah statutes.
53-3-506.   License expiration and renewal -- Fee required -- Disposition of revenue.

(1) (a)  All commercial driver training school licenses, commercial testing only school licenses, school operator licenses, and instructor licenses:

(i)  expire one year from the date of issuance; and

(ii)  may be renewed upon application to the commissioner as prescribed by rule.

(b)  Each application for an original or renewal school license, school operator license, or instructor license shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the department under Section  63J-1-504.

(c)  A license fee may not be refunded if the license is rejected, suspended, or revoked.

(2)  The license fees collected under this part shall be:

(a)  placed in a fund designated as the "Commercial Driver Training Law Fund"; and 

(b)  used under the supervision and direction of the director of the Division of Finance for the administration of this part.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

